Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 5 Anatomical Gifts and Organ Transplantation

The 2021 amendment

added “and Organ Transplantation” in the chapter heading.

Laws 2021, ch. 35, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 30, 2021.